Washington statutes.
RCW 7.88.040

Court review of application of privilege—Disclosure order.

In a proceeding in which the privilege provided by this chapter is asserted, a court of competent jurisdiction may determine after in camera review that the privilege does not apply to any or all of the documents for which the privilege is claimed, and if so, the court may order the materials disclosed but shall protect from disclosure any other material in or related to compliance review documents or to activities of compliance review personnel to which the privilege does apply.

[ 1997 c 435 s 5.]